Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202586-1064
Authority of commission; how construed.

The express authority granted to the commission to implement the 911 Service System Act shall not be deemed to supersede or otherwise modify section 86-124 or to provide the commission with any additional authority not provided by law existing on April 19, 2016, including, but not limited to, regulatory authority over originating service providers except as provided under section 86-1068.

Laws 2016, LB938, § 29;

Laws 2024, LB1031, § 12;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-1029;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 46.